Hawaii statutes.
§6K-8 Penalty. Any person who violates
any of the laws or rules applicable to the island reserve shall be guilty of a
petty misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned not
more than thirty days, or both, for each offense. Each day of each violation
shall be deemed a separate offense. [L 1993, c 340, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 66,
§2]

Case Notes

Cited: 132 H. 36, 319 P.3d 1044 (2014).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next